Utah statutes.
32A-4-302.   Commission's power to grant licenses -- Limitations.
(1)  A restaurant wanting to sell and allow the consumption of only wine,
heavy beer, and beer on its premises, but not spirituous liquor or a flavored
malt beverage, shall obtain a limited restaurant license from the commission
as provided in this part before selling or allowing the consumption of wine,
heavy beer, or beer on its premises.
(2) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this section and Subsection 32A-
4a-201(2), the commission may grant limited restaurant licenses for the
purpose of establishing limited restaurant outlets at places and in numbers
the commission considers proper for the storage, sale, and consumption of
wine, heavy beer, and beer on premises operated as public restaurants.
(b)  The total number of limited restaurant licenses granted under this part
may not at any time aggregate more than that number determined by dividing the
population of the state by 9,300.
(c)  For purposes of this Subsection (2), population shall be determined by:
(i)  the most recent United States decennial or special census; or
(ii)  another population determination made by the United States or state
governments.
(3) (a) (i)  The commission may grant seasonal limited restaurant licenses
established in areas the commission considers necessary.
(ii)  A seasonal limited restaurant license shall be for a period of six
consecutive months.
(b) (i)  A limited restaurant license granted for operation during a summer
time period is known as a "Seasonal A" limited restaurant license.  The period
of operation for a "Seasonal A" limited restaurant license shall:
(A)  begin on May 1; and
(B)  end on October 31.
(ii)  A limited restaurant license granted for operation during a winter time
period is known as a "Seasonal B" limited restaurant license.  The period of
operation for a "Seasonal B" limited restaurant license shall:
(A)  begin on November 1; and
(B)  end on April 30.
(iii)  In determining the number of limited restaurant licenses that the
commission may grant under this section:
(A)  a seasonal limited restaurant license is counted as one-half of one
limited restaurant license; and
(B)  each "Seasonal A" limited restaurant license shall be paired with a
"Seasonal B" limited restaurant license.
(c)  If the location, design, and construction of a hotel may require more
than one limited restaurant sales location within the hotel to serve the
public convenience, the commission may authorize the sale of wine, heavy beer,
and beer at as many as three limited restaurant locations within the hotel
under one license if:
(i)  the hotel has a minimum of 150 guest rooms; and
(ii)  all locations under the license are:
(A)  within the same hotel facility; and
(B)  on premises that are:
(I)  managed or operated by the licensee; and
(II)  owned or leased by the licensee.
(d)  A facility other than a hotel shall have a separate limited restaurant
license for each restaurant where wine, heavy beer, and beer are sold.
(4) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection (4), the premises of
a limited restaurant license may not be established:
(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method in
Subsection (4)(f); or
(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line
from the nearest entrance of the proposed outlet to the nearest property
boundary of the community location.
(b)  With respect to the establishment of a limited restaurant license, the
commission may authorize a variance to reduce the proximity requirement of
Subsection (4)(a)(i) if:
(i)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
limited restaurant license in the community are limited;
(iii)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances
and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the license would not be detrimental to the
public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
limited restaurant licensee is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (4)(b)(v)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a limited restaurant license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the limited restaurant
licensee is to be located for establishing a limited restaurant license to
satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection (4)(b)(v)(B)(I).
(c)  With respect to the establishment of a limited restaurant license, the
commission may authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of
Subsection (4)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the community location at issue is:
(A)  a public library; or
(B)  a public park;
(ii)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(iii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
limited restaurant license in the community are limited;
(iv)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(v)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and
the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the limited restaurant license would not be
detrimental to the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community;
and
(vi) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
limited restaurant licensee is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (4)(c)(vi)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a limited restaurant license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the limited restaurant
licensee is to be located for establishing a limited restaurant license to
satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection (4)(c)(vi)(B)(I).
(d)  With respect to the premises of a limited restaurant license granted by
the commission that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission may waive
or vary the proximity requirements of Subsection (4)(a) in considering whether
to grant a limited restaurant license to the new owner of the premises if:
(i) (A)  the premises previously received a variance reducing the proximity
requirement of Subsection (4)(a)(i); or
(B)  the premises received a variance reducing the proximity requirement of
Subsection (4)(a)(ii) on or before May 4, 2008; or
(ii)  a variance from proximity requirements was otherwise allowed under this
title.
(e)  With respect to the premises of a limited restaurant license granted by
the commission that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission shall
waive or vary the proximity requirements of Subsection (4)(a) in considering
whether to grant a limited restaurant license to the new owner of the premises
if:
(i)  when a limited restaurant license was granted to a previous owner, the
premises met the proximity requirements of Subsection (4)(a);
(ii)  the premises has had a limited restaurant license at all times since the
limited restaurant license described in Subsection (4)(e)(i) was granted
without a variance; and
(iii)  the community location located within the proximity requirements of
Subsection (4)(a) after the day on which the limited restaurant license
described in Subsection (4)(e)(i) was granted.
(f)  The 600 foot limitation as described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) is measured
from the nearest entrance of the outlet by following the shortest route of
ordinary pedestrian travel to the property boundary of the community location.
(5) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the
proximity of any educational, religious, and recreational facility, or any
other relevant factor in reaching a decision on a proposed location.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (5), "educational facility" includes:
(i)  a nursery school;
(ii)  an infant day care center; and
(iii)  a trade and technical school.
